Vermont, session 2025-2026, S167.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4028 is added to read:
§ 4028. POSSESSION OF SEMIAUTOMATIC ASSAULT WEAPONS
PROHIBITED
(a) A person shall not possess a semiautomatic assault weapon.
(b) A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned for not more
than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.
(c) This section shall not apply to any semiautomatic assault weapon
possessed by:
VT LEG #385113 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.167
2026 Page 2 of 4
(1) a federal law enforcement officer or a law enforcement officer
certified as a law enforcement officer by the Vermont Criminal Justice
Training Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2358 for legitimate law enforcement
purposes, whether the officer is on or off duty; or
(2) an active member of the Vermont National Guard, of the National
Guard of another state, or of the U.S. Armed Forces.
(d)(1) As used in this section, “semiautomatic assault weapon” means:
(A) a semiautomatic rifle that has the ability to accept a detachable
magazine and has at least one of the following features:
(i) a folding or telescoping stock;
(ii) a pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of
the weapon;
(iii) a thumbhole stock;
(iv) a second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the
nontrigger hand;
(v) a bayonet mount;
(vi) a flash suppressor, muzzle break, muzzle compensator, or
threaded barrel designed to accommodate a flash suppressor, muzzle break, or
muzzle compensator; or
(vii) a grenade launcher;
VT LEG #385113 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.167
2026 Page 3 of 4
(B) a semiautomatic pistol that has the ability to accept a detachable
magazine and has at least one of the following features:
(i) a folding or telescoping stock;
(ii) a thumbhole stock;
(iii) a second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the
nontrigger hand;
(iv) capacity to accept an ammunition magazine that attaches to
the pistol outside the pistol grip;
(v) a threaded barrel capable of accepting a barrel extender, flash
suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer;
(vi) a shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely
encircles, the barrel and that permits the shooter to hold the firearm with the
nontrigger hand without being burned;
(vii) a manufactured weight of 50 ounces or more when the pistol
is unloaded; or
(viii) a semiautomatic version of an automatic firearm; or
(C) a semiautomatic shotgun that has at least one of the following
features:
(i) a folding or telescoping stock;
(ii) a thumbhole stock;
VT LEG #385113 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.167
2026 Page 4 of 4
(iii) a second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the
nontrigger hand;
(iv) a fixed magazine capacity in excess of seven rounds; or
(v) the ability to accept a detachable magazine.
(2) “Semiautomatic assault weapon” does not include:
(A) a firearm that:
(i) is manually operated by bolt, pump, lever, or slide action;
(ii) has been rendered permanently inoperable; or
(iii) is an antique firearm as defined in section 4017 of this title;
(B) a semiautomatic rifle that cannot accept a detachable magazine
that holds more than five rounds of ammunition; or
(C) a semiautomatic shotgun that cannot hold more than five rounds
of ammunition in a fixed or detachable magazine.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385113 v.1